Utah statutes.
10-3-711.   Publication and posting of ordinances.

(1)  Before an ordinance may take effect, the legislative body of each municipality adopting an ordinance, except an ordinance enacted under Section 10-3-706, 10-3-707, 10-3-708, 10-3-709, or 10-3-710, shall:

(a)  deposit a copy of the ordinance in the office of the municipal recorder; and

(b) (i)  publish a short summary of the ordinance at least once:

(A)  in a newspaper published within the municipality; or

(B)  if there is no newspaper published within the municipality, in a newspaper of general circulation within the municipality; or

(ii)  post a complete copy of the ordinance:

(A)  for a city of the first class, in nine public places within the city; or

(B)  for any other municipality, in three public places within the municipality.

(2) (a)  Any ordinance, code, or book, other than the state code, relating to building or safety standards, municipal functions, administration, control, or regulations, may be adopted and shall take effect without further publication or posting, if reference is made to the code or book and at least one copy has been filed for use and examination by the public in the office of the recorder or clerk of the city or town prior to the adoption of the ordinance by the governing body.

(b)  Any state law relating to building or safety standards, municipal functions, administration, control, or regulations, may be adopted and shall take effect without further publication or posting if reference is made to the state code.

(c)  The ordinance adopting the code or book shall be published in the manner provided in this section.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2004 General Session

